California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
In order to provide the commission with an independent evaluation of routing proposals as the commission may desire from time to time, the commission may contract with specialists, including, but not limited to, persons trained and experienced in engineering, economics, landscape and design architecture, fish and wildlife management, park and recreation management, history and sociology, agriculture, and urban and regional planning. The commission is authorized to expend any funds in the State Highway Account to carry out the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

86.

The commission may delegate to the department any ministerial or administrative power, duty, responsibility, or function of the commission. The delegations authorized herein shall be upon such conditions and terms as the commission deems appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The Department of Transportation [90. - 155.7.]

90.

The department shall have full possession and control of all state highways and all property and rights in property acquired for state highway purposes. The department is authorized and directed to lay out and construct all state highways between the termini designated by law and on the locations as determined by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1018.)
-------------------------------------------

90.1.

The powers and duties enumerated in this section are intended to give the department broader authority to recruit and retain qualified civil engineers.

(a) The department shall develop and implement a recruitment and incentive program for highway engineer positions which may include, but not be limited to, participation by the department in the repayment of student loans of persons recruited through the program. The department shall not expend more than one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000) annually to develop and implement the student loan program,
 which may be paid from funds available to the department from the State Highway Account. 

(b) The department shall determine the number of engineers needed in each of its 12 transportation districts and shall recruit engineers based on the personnel-year needs in each of the districts. 

(c) In order to achieve the recruiting goal specified in subdivision (b), the director may offer salaries to prospective employees at any pay level above the lowest salary step, not to exceed the maximum of the range for which that person is qualified. Salaries of existing employees with similar qualifications in the same transportation district shall be increased to that level. 

(d) To encourage registration, persons employed in the department’s civil engineering entry level classification shall be eligible to advance to a higher
 salary range within the appropriate classification, as specified in the agreement entered into by the department and Professional Engineers in California Government on May 3, 1991. Movement within this range remains subject to performance criteria. 

(e) The department shall provide training or reimbursement for departmental approved training and related expenses to prepare employees for engineering license and certificate examinations. This training shall include, but is not limited to, preparation for civil engineering, land surveying, or landscape architect license examinations, and engineer-in-training or land surveyor-in-training certificate examinations. Employees shall be allowed time off without loss of compensation to attend departmental approved training or educational preparation for those licenses and certificates.

(f) The director may offer student loans of up to five
 thousand dollars ($5,000) per student for tuition, room, board, and expenses directly related to school attendance, to students enrolled in land surveying or Accreditation Board for Engineering and Technology (ABET) certified structural and civil engineering curriculums. While these loans are intended to help recruit new engineers into the department, the director is not precluded from offering student loans to permanent state employees, at the discretion of the director. The student or employee shall be obligated to repay the entire loan to the department. However, for the first two years the employee works for the department, or the first two additional years an employee agrees to stay with the department, five hundred dollars ($500) of the loan shall be forgiven. For every additional year of employment after the first two or additional two years, one thousand dollars ($1,000) of the loan shall be forgiven. If the employee voluntarily leaves the employment of the department prior to the entire loan being
 forgiven, the employee shall pay the remaining portion of the loan in accordance with a proportionate repayment policy adopted by the director. Criteria shall be established by the director to administer this program.

(g) The complexity of the department’s engineering work and the level of responsibility imposed on the department’s engineering staff have increased significantly. For example, engineering oversight for projects funded from sources such as county tax measures for transportation and the contracting out for basic engineering services have significantly increased that complexity and level of responsibility. To reflect this increase in complexity and level of responsibility, the first level of supervision for engineering positions shall be as specified in the agreement entered into by the department and Professional Engineers in California Government on May 3, 1991.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 305, Sec. 1.   Effective August 2, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

91.

The department shall improve and maintain the state highways, including all traversable highways which have been adopted or designated as state highways by the commission, as provided in this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 436.)
-------------------------------------------

91.2.

(a) The department shall perform construction inspection services for projects on or interfacing with the state highway system authorized pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 6820) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. The department shall use department employees or consultants under contract with the department to perform the services described in this subdivision and subdivision (b), consistent with Article XXII of the California Constitution. Construction inspection services performed by the department for those projects include, but are not limited to, material source testing, certification testing, surveying, monitoring of environmental compliance, independent quality control testing and inspection, and
 quality assurance audits. The construction inspection duties and responsibilities of the
 department shall include a direct reporting relationship between the inspectors and senior department engineers responsible for all inspectors and construction inspection services. The senior department engineer responsible for construction inspection services shall be responsible for the acceptance or rejection of the work.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall retain the authority to stop the contractor’s operation wholly or in part and take appropriate action when public safety is jeopardized on a project on or interfacing with the state highway system authorized pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 6820) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. The department shall ensure that public safety and convenience is maintained whenever work is performed under an encroachment permit within
 the state highway right-of-way, including, but not limited to, work performed that includes lane closures, signing, work performed at night, detours, dust control, temporary pavement quality, crash cushions, temporary railings, pavement transitions, falsework, shoring, and delineation. The department shall regularly inspect the job sites for safety compliance and any possible deficiencies. If any deficiency is observed, a written notice shall be sent by the department to the regional transportation agency’s designated resident engineer to correct the deficiency. Once the deficiency is corrected, a written notice describing the resolution of the deficiency shall be sent to the department and documented.

(c) The department shall use department employees or consultants under contract with the department to perform the services described
 in subdivisions (a) and (b), consistent with Article XXII of the California Constitution. Department employee and consultant resources necessary for the performance of those services, including personnel requirements, shall be included in the department’s capital outlay support program for workload purposes in the annual Budget Act.

(d) “Construction inspection services” shall not include surveying work performed as part of a design-build contract. 

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2034, and as of that date is repealed.

(f) If any provision or application of this section is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the department shall post on its internet website within 10 business days of the decision of invalidity that this section has been held invalid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 212, Sec. 3.   (AB 1499)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

91.41.

(a) The Clean California Local Grant Program of 2021 is hereby established, to be administered by the department, to provide funding, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purpose of allocating grants to local and regional public agencies, transit agencies, and tribal governments for purposes of beautifying and cleaning up local streets and roads, tribal lands, parks, pathways, transit centers, and other public spaces.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the program established pursuant to subdivision (a) achieves all of the following goals:

(1) Reduce the amount of waste and debris within public rights-of-way,
 tribal lands, parks, pathways, transit centers, and other public spaces.

(2) Enhance, rehabilitate, restore, or install measures to beautify and improve public spaces.

(3) Enhance public health, cultural connection, and community placemaking by improving public spaces for walking and recreation.

(4) Advance equity for underserved communities.

(c) The department shall expedite the award of grants pursuant to this section by issuing a call for projects within six months of the effective date of this section. The department shall announce grant awards within three months following the call for projects.

(d) (1) Within six months of the effective date of this section, the department shall develop guidelines, including project selection
 criteria and program evaluation metrics, to implement the program. The guidelines shall be exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(2) In developing guidelines pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall solicit input from local communities through at least two public workshops.

(3) The guidelines shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) A process for allocating no less than 50 percent of the program funds to projects that benefit underserved communities. The department shall establish a definition for underserved communities that may include, but need not be
 limited to, disadvantaged communities, as identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code, and low-income communities, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 39713 of the Health and Safety Code. A project eligible pursuant to this process shall clearly demonstrate a benefit to an underserved community or be directly located in an underserved community.

(B) Requirements for local matching funds of no more than 50 percent of the total project cost. The department may establish a lower percent or zero-match requirement for applicants based on severity of disadvantage.

(C) Project selection criteria that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(i) The
 demonstrated need of the applicant to address the goals of the program as described in subdivision (b).

(ii) The potential for the project to enhance and beautify a public space or spaces.

(iii) The potential for greening to provide shade, reduce the urban heat island effect, and use native, low-water plants.

(iv) The potential for abatement of litter and debris that improves access to use of a public space or spaces.

(v) Identification of the local public engagement process that culminated in the project proposal and reflects community priorities.

(vi) The benefit to underserved communities.

(D) Project types eligible for funding pursuant to the program
 that include, but are not limited to, both of the following:

(i) Community litter abatement projects, events, and educational programming.

(ii) Greening and landscaping projects.

(E) A limit of five million dollars ($5,000,000) maximum per grant awarded pursuant to the program.

(F) A prohibition on grants that fund projects that displace persons experiencing homelessness.

(G) A funding distribution that takes into account the population that each project is intended to benefit relative to the total population that all projects awarded grants pursuant to the program will benefit, and
 the needs of underserved communities.

(e) The department may authorize, and develop guidelines related to, an advance payment for a project funded by a grant awarded pursuant to the program. A grant applicant shall be eligible for an advance payment from the department for a project funded by a grant awarded pursuant to the program only if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The grant applicant is a public agency.

(2) The grant applicant requests an advance payment in its initial grant application.

(3) The project or project component for which the advance payment is requested is well defined and can be delivered by an agreed upon date.

(4) The grant applicant has a record of good financial management and has not been sanctioned by any state or federal agency.

(5) Upon request of the department, the grant applicant offers sufficient capital, as determined by the department, as security for an advance payment.

(6) Upon request of the department, the grant applicant provides a finding approved by its governing body that demonstrates a financial need for an advance payment pursuant to the program to deliver the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 150.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

91.42.

(a) The Clean California State Beautification Program of 2021 is hereby established, to be administered by the department, to provide funding, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for purposes of beautifying and cleaning up state highways.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the program established pursuant to subdivision (a) achieves all of the following goals:

(1) Reduce the amount of waste and debris within public rights-of-way, tribal lands, pathways, parks, transit centers, and other public spaces.

(2) Enhance, rehabilitate, restore, or install measures
 to beautify and improve public spaces.

(3) Enhance public health, cultural connection, and community placemaking by improving public spaces for walking and recreation.

(4) Advance equity for underserved communities.

(c) (1) Within six months of the effective date of this section, the department shall develop project selection criteria and program evaluation metrics and identify eligible projects.

(2) The project selection criteria shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The demonstrated need of the applicant to address the goals of the program
 as described in subdivision (b).

(B) The potential for the project to enhance and beautify a public space or spaces.

(C) The potential for greening to provide shade, reduce the urban heat island effect, and use native, low-water plants.

(D) The potential for abatement of litter and debris that improves access to use of a public space or spaces.

(E) Identification of the local public engagement process that culminated in the project proposal and reflects community priorities.

(F) The benefit to underserved communities. The department shall establish a definition for underserved communities that may
 include, but need not be limited to, disadvantaged communities, as identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code, and low-income communities, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 39713 of the Health and Safety Code.

(G) Project types eligible for funding pursuant to the program that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Greening and landscaping projects.

(ii) Gateway community identification projects.

(iii) Enhanced infrastructure safety measures.

(d) Consistent with applicable department policies and guidelines, program funds shall
 not be used to displace persons experiencing homelessness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 151.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

91.43.

(a) The department may use job order contracting to construct projects through the Clean California State Beautification Program of 2021 as follows:

(1) The department shall establish a procedure to prequalify job order contractors and shall prepare a set of documents for each job order contract. The documents shall include all of the following:

(A) A unit book of construction tasks with preestablished unit prices.

(B) Job order contract specifications.

(C) Any other information deemed necessary to adequately describe the department’s needs.

(2) Based on the documents prepared pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall prepare a request for bids that invites prequalified job order contractors to submit competitive sealed bids in the manner prescribed by the department.

(3) Job order contracts may be executed for an initial contract term of no more than 12 months, with the option of extending or renewing the job order contract for two 12-month periods. All extensions or renewals shall be priced as provided in the request for bids. An extension or renewal shall be mutually agreed to by the department and the job order contractor.

(4) Any job order contractor that is selected to construct a project pursuant to this subdivision shall possess or obtain sufficient bonding to cover the contract amount for construction services and risk and liability insurance
 as the department may require.

(5) Nothing in this subdivision is intended to affect, expand, alter, or limit any rights or remedies otherwise available by law.

(b) Project funds received pursuant to the Clean California Local Grant Program of 2021, the Clean California State Beautification Program of 2021, and any funds received by the department as reimbursement for project work under these programs shall not be considered transportation funds subject to Sections 182 and 183.

(c) The Legislature finds that it is in the best interest of the state to facilitate the quick and efficient purchase of vehicles and related equipment, goods, and systems. Notwithstanding Section 10295.2 of the Public Contract Code and Section 13332.09 of the Government Code, the department is hereby delegated the authority necessary to carry
 out the purchase of vehicles, equipment, or other products as needed to implement the department’s supplemental Fleet Acquisition Plan Fiscal Year 2021–22 for the acquisition of 269 medium- and heavy-duty vehicles and equipment to support litter abatement.

(d) As part of the 2022–23 and 2023–24 budgets, the department shall report to the Legislature on the Clean California Local Grant Program of 2021 and the Clean California State Beautification Program of 2021, including, but not limited to, the vehicles and equipment purchased pursuant to subdivision (c), cubic yards of litter collected, the locations and types of projects, and any other important project or program outcomes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 81, Sec. 18.   (AB 149)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

91.5.

(a) The department may enter into an agreement to accept funds, materials, equipment, or services from any person for maintenance or roadside enhancement, including the cleanup and abatement of litter, of a section of a state highway. The department and the sponsoring person may specify in the agreement the level of maintenance that will be performed.

(b) The director may authorize a courtesy sign. These courtesy signs shall be consistent with existing code provisions and
 department rules and regulations concerning signs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 489, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

91.6.

The department shall, within its maintenance programs relating to litter cleanup and abatement, assign a high priority to litter deposited along state highway segments adjoining storm drains, streams, rivers, waterways, beaches, the ocean, and other environmentally sensitive areas. The department may use litter traps in drains and any other effective technology in carrying out these responsibilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 489, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

91.8.

(a) The department shall, within its maintenance program, establish procedures for the removal and disposal of animal carcasses on state highways.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including, but not limited to, prohibitions on the possession and transportation of endangered or protected species, or the property rights associated with livestock and other commercially valuable animals, the department may remove or relocate an animal carcass from a state highway for
 safety purposes.

(c) The department shall dispose of animal carcasses in an environmentally appropriate manner considering both of the following:

(1) The animal’s probable legal status, whether as domestic or commercial property, wild, feral, protected, or endangered, as follows:

(A) When practicable, an owner of a domestic animal shall be notified of the location or disposition of the animal carcass. Unless returned to the owner, license tags, nameplates, or other identification shall be retained by the department for 30 days.

(B) A branded livestock carcass shall be removed from the roadway but not otherwise transported until the owner is contacted. If the owner cannot be identified, the department shall notify the regional brand inspector.

(C) In the case of wild, feral, protected, or endangered animals, disposal shall be accomplished in accordance with applicable provisions of the Fish and Game Code.

(2) If disposal technologies including, but not limited to, natural decomposition, burial, incineration, donation, rendering, or composting are not available or practicable, the department may use any nontraditional or novel technology that may be appropriate under the circumstances.

(d) Animal carcasses shall not be relocated to or disposed of within 150 feet of waterways or drainageways that lead directly to waterways, or buried within five feet of groundwater.

(e) The department shall maintain a record of designated disposal sites used for consolidation of animal
 carcasses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 257, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

91.9.

(a) On or before December 31, 2025, the department, in coordination with the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission and the Public Utilities Commission, shall evaluate the issues and policies impeding development of land within department-owned rights-of-way as renewable energy generation facilities, energy storage facilities,
 and electrical transmission and distribution facilities.

(b) The evaluation described in subdivision (a) shall do all of the following:

(1) Consider the department owning the facilities,
 or leasing, granting easements over, or entering into joint-use agreements with public utilities or other entities for facility development within department-owned rights-of-way.

(2) Evaluate the suitability of the various types of department-owned rights-of-way for the development of renewable energy generation and energy 
 storage facilities.

 (3) Identify the issues and policies impeding the use of department-owned rights-of-way that could be made available for the development of renewable energy generation and energy storage facilities, to the maximum extent economically feasible,
 including consideration of
 existing laws, safety, suitability, and other priorities that the department has identified for the department-owned rights-of-way.

(4) Identify, to the extent possible, the amount of renewable energy generation
 and energy storage capacity on the various types of department-owned rights-of-way that
 could feasibly be developed to achieve the goals stated in Section 454.53 of the Public Utilities Code.

(5) Evaluate, in coordination with the Public Utilities Commission, the Independent System Operator, and other balancing authorities, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 399.12 of the Public Utilities Code, the suitability of
 the various types of department-owned rights-of-way for the development of needed electrical transmission and distribution facilities. The evaluation of suitability shall consider and prioritize the need for increased electrical transmission and distribution capacity as identified by the Public Utilities Commission, the Independent System Operator, or other balancing
 authorities.

 (6) Identify issues and policies impeding the use of department-owned rights-of-way for the development of needed electrical transmission and distribution facilities, including consideration of existing laws, safety, suitability, and other priorities that the department has
 identified for the department-owned rights-of-way.

(7) Include requirements for the development of renewable energy generation, energy storage facilities, and electrical transmission and distribution facilities within department-owned rights-of-way, including any safety or environmental issues and the steps that projects will be required to take to mitigate these issues.

(8) Establish a process for entities interested in leasing or
 obtaining an easement or joint-use agreement for land within department-owned rights-of-way to operate and build a renewable energy generation facility, an energy storage facility, or an electrical transmission or distribution facility to apply to the department for land use agreements under terms that reasonably encompass the useful life of the project.

(9) Provide recommendations to facilitate the
 development of renewable energy generation facilities, energy storage facilities, and electrical transmission and distribution facilities on department-owned rights-of-way.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 379, Sec. 1.   (SB 49)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

92.

The department may do any act necessary, convenient or proper for the construction, improvement, maintenance or use of all highways which are under its jurisdiction, possession or control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 436.)
-------------------------------------------

92.1.

(a) The department shall update guidance by July 1, 2021, to specify the appropriate use of positive protection measures, including, but not limited to, automated flagger assistance devices, buffer lanes, impact attenuator vehicles, and temporary barriers, with the goal of isolating workers or work zones from traffic.

(b) Where the department’s updated guidance allows, but does not require, use of a safety device, the department shall provide compensation for the optional safety device when requested by a contractor on a public works project of the department.

(c) (1) The department shall submit a report to the Legislature by January 1, 2024, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code that includes findings and recommendations on the use of positive protection measures used pursuant to this section.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under this subdivision is inoperative on January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(d) After the report required by subdivision (c) is submitted to the Legislature, the department shall prescribe standards and specifications that are consistent with the updated guidance developed pursuant to subdivision (a) to require the appropriate use of positive protection on all covered activities on the state highway system. In developing these standards and specifications, the department shall solicit input from relevant
 stakeholders, including, but not limited to, construction labor groups, contractors, utilities, local agencies, and community organizations.

(e) The department may adopt regulations as necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the department pursuant to this section.

(f) (1) A contractor that has requested and received compensation for an optional safety device pursuant to subdivision (b) shall use the
 optional safety device in conformance with the department’s guidance.

(2) The Division of Occupational Safety and Health, in consultation with the department, may adopt regulations as necessary or appropriate to administer and enforce paragraph (1).

(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Covered activity” means all construction and maintenance activities performed on a state highway right-of-way, including, but not limited to, utility work and repair activities.

(2) “Positive protection” means barriers or other devices placed between workers and motorized traffic that contain or redirect vehicles and meet applicable crashworthy criteria, as contained in Section 1A.13 of the California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 813, Sec. 1.   (AB 752)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

92.2.

Where practical or desirable, the department shall, along any highway under its jurisdiction, possession, or control, replace trees that have been destroyed or removed because of projects undertaken to widen the highway.

Money from the State Highway Account available for the widening of highways shall also be available for the planting of trees pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

92.3.

(a) The department shall do both of the following:

(1) Discontinue further water intensive freeway landscaping and use drought resistant landscaping whenever feasible, taking into consideration such factors as erosion control and fire retardant needs.

(2) Eliminate any dependency on imported water for landscaping as soon as practicable.

(b) The department shall require the use of recycled water for the irrigation of freeway landscaping when it finds and determines that all of the following conditions exist:

(1) The recycled water is of adequate quality and is available in adequate quantity for the proposed use.

(2) The proposed use of the recycled water is approved by the California regional water quality control board having jurisdiction.

(3) There is a direct benefit to the state highway program for the proposed use of recycled water.

(4) The recycled water is supplied by a local public agency or water public utility able to contract for delivery of water and the installation, maintenance, and repair of facilities to deliver the water.

(5) The installation of the water delivery facilities does not unreasonably
 increase any hazard to vehicles on the freeway or create unreasonable problems of highway maintenance and repair.

(c) In cooperation with local public agencies and water public utilities, the department shall permit local public agencies and water public utilities to place transmission lines for recycled water in freeway rights-of-way for use by the local public agencies and water public utilities to transmit recycled water to others, when to do so will promote a beneficial use of recycled water and that transmission does not unreasonably interfere with use of the freeway or unreasonably increase any hazard to vehicles on the freeway, subject to paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) and the following additional requirements:

(1) The local public agency or water
 public utility holds the department harmless for any liability caused by a disruption of service to other users of the recycled water and will defend the department in any resulting legal action and pay any damages awarded as a result of that disruption.

(2) The department, in cooperation with the local public agency or water public utility, may temporarily interrupt service in order to add to or modify its facilities without liability, as specified in paragraph (1).

(3) The local public agency or water public utility obtains and furnishes the department an agreement by all other users of recycled water from the transmission system holding the department harmless for any disruption in service.

(4) The local public agency
 or water public utility has furnished the department a list of other recycled water users and information on any backup system or other source of water available for use in case of a service disruption.

(5) The local public agency is responsible for the initial cost or any relocation cost of the recycled water transmission lines for service to other users in the right-of-way and waives its rights to require the department to pay the relocation costs pursuant to Sections 702 and 704.

(6) The local public agency or water public utility maintains the water transmission system subject to reasonable access for maintenance purposes to be negotiated between the department and the local public agency or water public utility.

(7) The department has first priority with respect to the recycled water supply contracted for by the department.

(8) The local public agency or water public utility installs an automatic control system which will allow the water transmission system to be shut down in case of an emergency. The department shall have access to all parts of the transmission system for purposes of the agreement.

(9) All transmission lines are placed underground and as close as possible to the freeway right-of-way boundary or at other locations authorized by the department.

(10) The plans and specifications for the recycled water transmission facilities have been approved by the department prior to construction.

(d) When appropriate and consistent with integrated pest management strategies as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 14717 of the Government Code, planting projects undertaken or approved by the department shall include California native wildflowers and native and climate-appropriate vegetation as an integral and permanent part of the planting design, with priority given to those species of wildflowers and native and climate-appropriate vegetation that will help rebuild pollinator populations.

(e) As used in this section:

(1) “Local public agency”
 means any local public agency that transmits or supplies recycled water to others.

(2) “Water public utility” means any privately owned water corporation that is subject to the jurisdiction and control of the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 165, Sec. 1.   (AB 2062)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

92.4.

Where a city street or county road abuts upon real property acquired by the state for freeway purposes, the department may contribute toward the cost of construction of the half of such street or road that directly fronts or abuts upon such property if such street or road was established, but not yet constructed, at the time when the location of such freeway was established by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

92.5.

The department shall install, in all tunnels and underpasses on state highways within metropolitan areas where the tunnel or underpass is of sufficient length to impede radio reception, wires, or other devices which will sustain reception of broadcasts by radios in vehicles traveling through the tunnels and underpasses.

The Legislature declares that the installation of such devices in state highway tunnels and underpasses is an improvement of highways within the meaning of Section 1 of Article XIX of the California Constitution since it will assist law enforcement officers in their patrol duties by enabling them to
 receive essential radio calls and also will increase the enjoyment of the people in the use of the state highways.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

92.6.

At such locations as shall be determined by the department to be appropriate, screening shall be installed and maintained on state freeway overpasses on which pedestrians are allowed, in order to prevent objects from being dropped or thrown upon vehicles passing underneath. First consideration shall be given to freeway overpasses in urban areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 589.)
-------------------------------------------

92.7.

(a) (1) Beginning on or before July 1, 2028, the department shall, in consultation with the State Department of Public Health and in collaboration with impacted local governments, incorporate suicide deterrent considerations in the updates of applicable guidance documents.

(2) Suicide deterrent considerations shall include, but not be limited to, the evaluation and adoption of guidance for countermeasures that may deter suicide attempts on bridges and overpasses on the state highway system, including the design, placement, and modification of barriers, fencing, and other infrastructure.

(3) A suicide deterrent consideration incorporated into guidance
 documents pursuant to this subdivision shall be as determined by the department to be appropriate.

(b) This section does not impose a mandatory duty pursuant to Section 815.6 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 427, Sec. 1.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

92.8.

(a) (1) On or before July 1, 2028, the department shall identify best practices for the implementation of suicide countermeasures designed to deter suicide attempts on bridges and overpasses.

(2) In evaluating appropriate physical infrastructure, design features, and related deterrent measures, the department shall consider feedback from local jurisdictions and other stakeholders.

(3) Any countermeasures implemented pursuant to this section shall be as determined by the department to be appropriate.

(b) The department shall consult with the State Department of Public Health, behavioral health
 experts, and other relevant stakeholders in implementing this section.
